src/import/nouns.lexc
lõhestuspoliitika+N:lõhestus#poliitika AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhestuvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhestuvus SUULINE ;
lõhi+N:lõh NIMI ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhik+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhik VIRSIK ;
lõhilane+N:lõhilane OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhis SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhk+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õhK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
lõhkeaine+N:l´õhke#´aine PINGE ;
lõhkekeha+N:l´õhke#keha%>%{pl.i%} KAVA ;
lõhkepea+N:l´õhke#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõhkuja+N:l´õhkuja AASTA ;
lõhkumine+N:l´õhkumine OLULINE ;
lõhmus+N:lõhmus SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhn+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õhn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõhnaauk+N:lõhna#´auk%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõhnaküünal+N:lõhna#k´üünA2l PIPAR ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhnastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhnastus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhnatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhnatus OLULINE ;
lõhnavesi+N:lõhna#veS1%{stemill%} MESI ;
lõhnaõli+N:lõhna#õl,i KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhustus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhutavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhutavus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhvard+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhvard REDEL ;
lõhverdaja+N:lõhverdaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhverdis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhverdis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhverdus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõhverdus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõigend+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõigend REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõigustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõigustus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõik+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõikaja+N:l´õikaja AASTA ;
lõikamine+N:l´õikamine OLULINE ;
lõikelill+N:l´õike#l´ill%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
lõikmed+N:l´õiK2E2 HAARE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõikur+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õikur REDEL ;
lõikuskuu+N:l´õikus#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõim+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õim%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõimetis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõimetis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõimetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõimetus OLULINE ;
lõimetusaeg+N:lõimetus#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõimis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõimis SOOLANE ;
lõiv+N:l´õiv%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõkad+N:lõka PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõkard+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõkard REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõkats+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõkats REDEL ;
lõke+N:l´õkK1e PINGE ;
lõke+N:l´õkkE2 HAARE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõkendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõkendus OLULINE ;
lõkerdaja+N:lõkerdaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõkerdis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõkerdis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõkerdus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõkerdus OLULINE ;
lõkketuli+N:l´õkke#tul,%{stemill%} MERI ;
lõks+N:l´õks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõksatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõksatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõksutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõksutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõmps+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õmps TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõmps+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õmps%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõmpsimine+N:l´õmpsimine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõng+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õng%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõngajupp+N:lõnga#j´upp TAUD ;
lõngakera+N:lõnga#kera%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
lõngaviht+N:lõnga#v´ihT1 TAUD ;
lõngaõli+N:lõnga#õl,i KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõngus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõngus SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõnks+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õnks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@R.Part.One@lõo+N:@R.Part.One@l´õo ARMEE ;
lõoke+N:l´õo PÄIKE ;
lõosilm+N:l´õo#s´ilm%>%{pl.i%} SILM ;
lõpe+N:l´õpP1E2 HAARE ;
lõpe+N:l´õpP1e PINGE ;
lõpetaja+N:lõpetaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpetamatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpetamatus SUULINE ;
lõpetamine+N:lõpetamine OLULINE ;
lõpetanu+N:lõpetanu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpetatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpetatus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpetis+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpetis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpetus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõplikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpl´ikkus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpmatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpmatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpmik+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpm´ik ÄMBLIK ;
lõpmine+N:l´õpmine OLULINE ;
lõpnu+N:l´õpnu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpp+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpp%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõpp-peatus+N:l´õpp-p´eatus SUULINE ;
lõpp-punkt+N:l´õpp-p´unkt TAUD ;
lõpparuanne+N:l´õpp#aru#´annD1e PINGE ;
lõpparve+N:l´õpp#´arve PINGE ;
lõppeesmärk+N:l´õpp#´ees#m´ärk TAUD ;
lõppemine+N:l´õppemine OLULINE ;
lõpphind+N:l´õpp#h´innD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpphääletus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpp#hääletus OLULINE ;
lõppjärk+N:l´õpp#j´ärk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
lõppkokkuvõte+N:l´õpp#k´okku#v´õtT1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpplahendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpp#lahendus OLULINE ;
lõpposa+N:l´õpp#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõppotsus+N:l´õpp#otsus SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpptulemus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpp#tulemus OLULINE ;
lõppvariant+N:l´õpp#vari´an,t TAUD ;
lõppvoor+N:l´õpp#v´oor%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõppvõistlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õpp#v´õistlus SUULINE ;
@R.Part.One@lõpu-yaa+N:@R.Part.One@lõpu-y´aa ARMEE ;
lõpueksam+N:lõpu#´eksam REDEL ;
lõpuhetk+N:lõpu#h´etk%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
lõpujoon+N:lõpu#j´oon%{stemill%} KEEL ;
lõpukaader+N:lõpu#k´aadE2r REDEL ;
lõpukaart+N:lõpu#k´aart TAUD ;
lõpukadu+N:lõpu#kaD1u KAVA ;
lõpukilomeeter+N:lõpu#kilo#m´eetE2r REDEL ;
lõpuklass+N:lõpu#kl´as,s TAUD ;
lõpukord+N:lõpu#k´orrD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
lõpukuu+N:lõpu#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõpulejõudmine+N:lõpule#j´õudmine SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpuleviidus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpule#v´iidus SUULINE ;
lõpuminut+N:lõpu#minut REDEL ;
lõpuosa+N:lõpu#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõpupäev+N:lõpu#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõpus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpus SOOLANE ;
lõpusesed+N:lõpusene OLULINE ;
lõpusireen+N:lõpu#sir´een TAUD ;
lõpusirge+N:lõpu#s´irge AASTA ;
lõpuspurt+N:lõpu#sp´urt TAUD ;
lõputegemine+N:lõpu#tegemine OLULINE ;
lõputiiter+N:lõpu#t´iitE2r REDEL ;
lõputseremoonia+N:lõpu#tserem´oonia AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõputunnistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõpu#tun,nistus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõputus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõputus OLULINE ;
lõpuvile+N:lõpu#vile PERE ;
lõrin+N:lõrin MAGUS ;
lõss+N:l´õs,s TAUD ;
lõtk+N:l´õtk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõtvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õtvus SUULINE ;
lõuahabe+N:lõua#habe HAARE ;
lõuajoon+N:lõua#j´oon%{stemill%} KEEL ;
lõualuu+N:lõua#l´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõualõksutamine+N:lõua#lõksutamine OLULINE ;
lõuamees+N:lõua#me MEES ;
lõuaots+N:lõua#´ots%>%{pl.i%} KAEL ;
lõuapoolik+N:lõua#pool,ik VIRSIK ;
lõuapuu+N:lõua#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõuapära+N:lõua#pära KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõuats+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõuats REDEL ;
lõuatäis+N:lõua#t´äiS1%{stemill%} VARS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõuend+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõuend REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõug+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õuG1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõugamine+N:l´õugamine OLULINE ;
lõugas+N:l´õuK2a KOTKAS ;
lõugne+N:l´õugne SOOLANE ;
lõuguti+N:lõuguti AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõugutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõugutus OLULINE ;
lõukoer+N:l´õu#k´oer%>%{pl.i%} KAEL ;
lõuna+N:l´õuna LÕUNA ;
lõunaaeg+N:l´õuna#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõunakaar+N:l´õuna#k´aar%{stemill%} KEEL ;
lõunalaud+N:l´õuna#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõunaline+N:l´õunaline OLULINE ;
lõunamaa+N:l´õuna#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõunamaalane+N:l´õuna#m´aalane SUULINE ;
lõunanaaber+N:l´õuna#n´aabE2r REDEL ;
lõunaosa+N:l´õuna#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõunapoolkera+N:l´õuna#p´ool#kera%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
lõunapäike+N:l´õuna#p´äi PÄIKE ;
lõunarannik+N:l´õuna#ran,nik VIRSIK ;
lõunasadam+N:l´õuna#sadam MAGUS ;
lõunaserv+N:l´õuna#s´erv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
lõunasöök+N:l´õuna#s´öök TAUD ;
lõunatoit+N:l´õuna#t´oit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõunatund+N:l´õuna#t´unnD1 TAUD ;
lõunatuul+N:l´õuna#t´uul%{stemill%} KEEL ;
lõunauinak+N:l´õuna#uinak VIRSIK ;
lõunavaheaeg+N:l´õuna#vahe#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõust+N:l´õust%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõvi+N:lõv NIMI ;
lõvi+N:lõvi KAVA ;
lõvikoobas+N:lõvi#k´ooP2a KOTKAS ;
lõvilakk+N:lõvi#l´akk%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
lõviosa+N:lõvi#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõõg+N:l´õõG1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
lõõgastumine+N:lõõgastumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõgastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõõgastus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõm+N:@P.NomStem.First@l´õõm%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõmutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@lõõmutus OLULINE ;
